Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-2323
County funds; deposit; violation; penalty.

Any treasurer or any officer of a bank, capital stock financial institution, or qualifying mutual financial institution who shall directly or indirectly violate or knowingly permit to be violated sections 77-2316 to 77-2323 so far as such sections relate to the deposit of public money in a bank, capital stock financial institution, or qualifying mutual financial institution shall be guilty of a Class IV felony. Section 77-2366 shall apply to deposits in capital stock financial institutions. Section 77-2365.01 shall apply to deposits in qualifying mutual financial institutions.

Laws 1925, c. 96, § 1, p. 279;

Laws 1927, c. 34, § 2, p. 156;

Laws 1929, c. 36, § 1, p. 151;

C.S.1929, § 77-2508;

Laws 1935, c. 152, § 4, p. 563;

Laws 1939, c. 103, § 3, p. 464;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 77-2508;

R.S.1943, § 77-2323;

Laws 1977, LB 39, § 232;

Laws 1989, LB 33, § 42;

Laws 2001, LB 362, § 42.